test/src/morphology/V-taplwma57_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `taplõma: # Verb (57) `taplõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `taplõma+V+Inf/mA: `taplõma
     `taplõma+V+Inf: tapõldaq
     `taplõma+V+ActPrtPrc: tapõlnuq
     `taplõma+V+PssPrtPrc: tapõld
     `taplõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: `taplõ
     `taplõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: `taplõs
     `taplõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `tapli
     `taplõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: tapõï
